Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2594.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:STATE POLICYNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 101. It shall be the policy of the state of Washington that:(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that each child of a homeless individual and each homeless youth has equal access to the same free, appropriate public education, including a public preschool education for qualifying children, as provided to other children and youths;(2) When requirements of law, practice, or policy, including compulsory residency requirements, create barriers to the identification of or to the enrollment, attendance, or success in school of homeless children and youths, the office of the superintendent of public instruction and school districts must review and undertake steps to revise such laws, regulations, practices, or policies to ensure that homeless children and youths are afforded the same free, appropriate public education as provided to other children and youths;(3) Homelessness is not sufficient reason to separate students from the mainstream school environment; and(4) Homeless children and youths should have access to the education and other services that such children and youths need to ensure that such children and youths have an opportunity to meet the same challenging state academic standards to which all students are held.DEFINITIONSNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 201. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Enroll" and "enrollment" include attending classes and participating fully in school activities.(2) "Homeless children and youths" means individuals who lack a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence and includes:(a) Children and youths who are sharing the housing of other persons due to loss of housing, economic hardship, or a similar reason; are living in motels, hotels, trailer parks, or camping grounds due to the lack of alternative adequate accommodations; are living in emergency or transitional shelters; or are abandoned in hospitals;(b) Children and youths who have a primary nighttime residence that is a public or private place not designed for or ordinarily used as a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings;(c) Children and youths who are living in cars, parks, public spaces, abandoned buildings, substandard housing, bus or train stations, or similar settings; and(d) Migratory children, as such term is defined in 20 U.S.C. Sec. 6399, who qualify as homeless for the purposes of this chapter or under applicable federal law, because the children are living in circumstances described in (a) through (c) of this subsection.(3) "School of origin" means the school that a child or youth attended when permanently housed or the school in which the child or youth was last enrolled, including a preschool. When the child or youth completes the final grade level served by the school of origin, the term "school of origin" includes the designated receiving school at the next grade level for all feeder schools.(4) "Unaccompanied youth" includes a homeless child or youth not in the physical custody of a parent or guardian.STATE PLAN FOR THE EDUCATION OF HOMELESS CHILDRENNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 301. (1) The superintendent of public instruction shall submit to the legislature a plan to provide for the education of homeless children and youths within the state. Such plan must include the following:(a) A description of how homeless children and youths are, or will be, given the opportunity to meet the same challenging state academic standards as all students are expected to meet;(b) A description of the procedures the office of the superintendent of public instruction will use to identify homeless children and youths in the state and to assess their needs;(c) A description of procedures for the prompt resolution of disputes regarding the educational placement of homeless children and youths;(d) A description of programs for school personnel, including school district liaisons designated under (j)(ii) of this subsection, principals and other school leaders, attendance officers, teachers, enrollment personnel, and specialized instructional support personnel, to heighten the awareness of such school personnel of the specific needs of homeless children and youths, including such children and youths who are runaway and homeless youths;(e) A description of procedures that ensure that homeless children and youths who meet the relevant eligibility criteria are able to participate in federal, state, or local nutrition programs;(f) A description of procedures that ensure that:(i) Homeless children and youths who meet the relevant eligibility criteria have access to public preschool programs administered by school districts to the same extent as other children;(ii) Homeless children and youths, and youths separated from public schools, are identified and accorded equal access to appropriate secondary education and support services, including by identifying and removing barriers that prevent youths described in this subsection from receiving appropriate credit for full or partial coursework satisfactorily completed while attending a prior school, in accordance with state, local, and school policies; and(iii) Homeless children and youths who meet the relevant eligibility criteria do not face barriers to accessing academic and extracurricular activities, including magnet school, summer school, career and technical education, advanced placement, alternative learning experience courses, and charter school programs, if such programs are available at the local levels;(g) Strategies to address problems identified in the report provided to the secretary of the United States department of education under section 601(2)(c) of this act, if applicable;(h) Strategies to address other problems with respect to the education of homeless children and youths, including problems resulting from enrollment delays that are caused by:(i) Requirements of immunization and other required health records;(ii) Residency requirements;(iii) Lack of birth certificates, school records, or other documentation;(iv) Guardianship issues; or(v) Uniform or dress code requirements;(i) A demonstration that the office of the superintendent of public instruction and all school districts have developed, and shall review and revise, policies to remove barriers to the identification of homeless children and youths, and the enrollment and retention of homeless children and youths in schools in the state, including barriers to enrollment and retention due to outstanding fees or fines, or absences, if applicable;(j) Assurances that the following will be carried out:(i) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and all school districts will adopt policies and practices to ensure that homeless children and youths are not stigmatized or segregated on the basis of their status as homeless;(ii) All school districts will designate an appropriate staff person, able to carry out the duties described in section 501 of this act, who may also be a coordinator for other federal programs, as a school district liaison for homeless children and youths;(iii) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and all school districts will adopt policies and practices to ensure that transportation is provided, at the request of the parent or guardian, or in the case of an unaccompanied youth, the school district liaison, to and from the school of origin, as determined in accordance with section 401 of this act, and in accordance with the following, as applicable:(A) If the homeless child or youth continues to live in the area served by the school district in which the school of origin is located, the homeless child's or youth's transportation to and from the school of origin must be provided or arranged by the school district in which the school of origin is located; and(B) If the homeless child's or youth's living arrangements in the area served by the school district of origin terminate and the homeless child or youth, though continuing the homeless child's or youth's education in the school of origin, begins living in an area served by another school district, the school district of origin and the school district in which the homeless child or youth is living shall agree upon a method to apportion the responsibility and costs for providing the homeless child or youth with transportation to and from the school of origin. If the school districts are unable to agree upon such method, the responsibility and costs for transportation must be shared equally; and(iv) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and all school districts will adopt policies and practices to ensure participation by school district liaisons in professional development and other technical assistance activities provided pursuant to section 601(2) (e) and (f) of this act, as determined appropriate by the office of the coordinator for education of homeless children and youths established in section 601 of this act; and(k) A description of how homeless youths will receive assistance from counselors to advise such youths and prepare and improve the readiness of such youths for college.(2) The plan adopted under this section must also: Describe how the state will ensure that school districts will comply with the requirements of section 401 of this act, and indicate what technical assistance the state will furnish to school districts and how compliance efforts will be coordinated with the school district liaisons designated under subsection (1)(j)(ii) of this section.DUTIES AND OBLIGATIONS OF SCHOOL DISTRICTSNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 401. (1) The school district serving each homeless child or youth to be assisted under this chapter shall, according to the homeless child's or youth's best interest:(a) Continue the homeless child's or youth's education in the school of origin for the duration of homelessness:(i) In any case in which a family becomes homeless between school years or during school year; and(ii) For the remainder of the academic year, if the homeless child or youth becomes permanently housed during a school year; or(b) Enroll the homeless child or youth in any public school that nonhomeless students who live in the attendance area in which the homeless child or youth is actually living are eligible to attend, and provide the homeless child's or youth's academic records to the school in which the homeless child or youth is enrolling.(2) In determining the best interest of the homeless child or youth under subsection (1) of this section, the school district shall:(a) Presume that keeping the homeless child or youth in the school of origin is in the homeless child's or youth's best interest, except when doing so is contrary to the request of the homeless child's or youth's parent or guardian, or, in the case of an unaccompanied youth, the youth;(b) Consider student-centered factors related to the homeless child's or youth's best interest, including factors related to the impact of mobility on achievement, education, health, and safety of homeless children and youth, giving priority to the request of the homeless child's or youth's parent or guardian or, in the case of an unaccompanied youth, the youth;(c) If, after conducting the best interest determination based on consideration of the presumption in (a) of this subsection (2) and the student-centered factors in (b) of this subsection (2), the school district determines that it is not in the homeless child's or youth's best interest to attend the school of origin or the school requested by the parent or guardian, or, in the case of an unaccompanied youth, the youth, provide the homeless child's or youth's parent or guardian or the unaccompanied youth with a written explanation of the reasons for its determination, in a manner and form understandable to such parent, guardian, or unaccompanied youth, including information regarding the right to appeal under subsection (5) of this section; and(d) In the case of an unaccompanied youth, ensure that the school district liaison designated under section 301(1)(j)(ii) of this act assists in placement or enrollment decisions under this subsection, gives priority to the views of such unaccompanied youth, and provides notice to such youth of the right to appeal under subsection (5) of this section.(3)(a) The school selected in accordance with subsection (2) of this section shall immediately enroll the homeless child or youth, even if the homeless child or youth:(i) Is unable to produce records normally required under RCW 28A.225.330 for enrollment, such as previous academic records, records of immunization and other required health records, proof of residency, or other documentation; or(ii) Has missed application or enrollment deadlines during any period of homelessness.(b) The enrolling school shall immediately contact the school last attended by the homeless child or youth to obtain relevant academic and other records.(c) If the homeless child or youth needs to obtain immunizations or other required health records, the enrolling school shall immediately refer the parent or guardian of the homeless child or youth, or, in the case of an unaccompanied youth, the youth, to the school district liaison designated under section 301(1)(j)(ii) of this act, who shall assist in obtaining necessary immunizations or screenings, or immunization or other required health records, in accordance with subsection (4) of this section.(4) Any record ordinarily kept by the school, including immunization or other required health records, academic records, birth certificates, guardianship records, and evaluations for special services or programs, regarding each homeless child or youth must be maintained so that the records involved are available, in a timely fashion, when a homeless child or youth enters a new school or school district.(5) If a dispute arises over eligibility, or school selection or enrollment in a school:(a) The homeless child or youth must be immediately enrolled in the school in which enrollment is sought, pending final resolution of the dispute, including all available appeals;(b) The parent or guardian of the homeless child or youth or, in the case of an unaccompanied youth, the youth must be provided with a written explanation of any decisions related to school selection or enrollment made by the school, the school district, or the office of the superintendent of public instruction, including the rights of the parent, guardian, or unaccompanied youth to appeal such decisions;(c) The parent, guardian, or unaccompanied youth must be referred to the school district liaison designated under section 301(1)(j)(ii) of this act, who shall carry out the dispute resolution process as described in section 301(1)(c) as expeditiously as possible after receiving notice of the dispute; and(d) In the case of an unaccompanied youth, the school district liaison shall ensure that the youth is immediately enrolled in the school in which the youth seeks enrollment pending resolution of such dispute.(6) The choice regarding placement must be made regardless of whether the homeless child or youth lives with the homeless parents or has been temporarily placed elsewhere.(7) Information about a homeless child's or youth's living situation must be treated as a student education record, and may not be deemed to be directory information, under 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g.(8) Nothing in this section prohibits a school district from requiring a parent or guardian of a homeless child or youth to submit contact information.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 402. (1) Each homeless child or youth to be assisted under this chapter must be provided services comparable to services offered to other students in the school selected under section 401(1) of this act, including the following:(a) Transportation services;(b) Educational services for which the homeless child or youth meets the eligibility criteria, such as services provided under Title I of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. 6301 et seq.) or similar state or local programs, educational programs for children with disabilities, and educational programs for English learners;(c) Programs in career and technical education;(d) Programs for highly capable students; and(e) School nutrition programs.(2) Each school district serving homeless children and youths that receives funding provided by specific reference for this chapter in the omnibus appropriations act shall coordinate:(a) The provision of services under this chapter with local social services agencies and other agencies or entities providing services to homeless children and youths and their families, including services and programs funded under the runaway and homeless youth act, 42 U.S.C. 5701 et seq.; and(b) Transportation, transfer of school records, and other interdistrict activities, with other school districts.(3) If applicable, each school district that receives funding for implementing this chapter shall coordinate with state and local housing agencies responsible for developing the comprehensive housing affordability strategy described in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 12705 to minimize educational disruption for children and youths who become homeless.(4) The coordination required under subsections (2) and (3) of this section must be designed to:(a) Ensure that all homeless children and youths are promptly identified;(b) Ensure that all homeless children and youths have access to, and are in reasonable proximity to, available education and related support services; and(c) Raise the awareness of school personnel and service providers of the effects of short-term stays in a shelter and other challenges associated with homelessness.(5) For homeless children and youths who are to be assisted both under this chapter and under the individuals with disabilities education act, 20 U.S.C. 1400 et seq. or 29 U.S.C. Sec. 794, each school district shall coordinate the provision of services under this chapter with the provision of programs for children with disabilities served by that school district and other involved school districts.SCHOOL DISTRICT LIAISONSNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 501. (1) Each school district liaison for homeless children and youths, designated under section 301(1)(j)(ii) of this act, shall ensure that:(a) Homeless children and youths are identified by school personnel through outreach and coordination activities with other entities and agencies;(b) Homeless children and youths are enrolled in, and have a full and equal opportunity to succeed in, schools of that school district;(c) Homeless families and homeless children and youths have access to and receive educational services for which such families, children, and youths are eligible, including services through head start programs, including early head start programs under the head start act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9831 et seq., early intervention services under Part C of the individuals with disabilities education act, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1431 et seq., and other preschool programs administered by the school district;(d) Homeless families and homeless children and youths receive referrals to health care services, dental services, mental health and substance abuse services, housing services, and other appropriate services;(e) The parents or guardians of homeless children and youths are informed of the educational and related opportunities available to their children and are provided with meaningful opportunities to participate in the education of their children;(f) Public notice of the educational rights of homeless children and youths is disseminated in locations frequented by parents or guardians of such children and youths, and unaccompanied youths, including schools, shelters, public libraries, and soup kitchens, in a manner and form understandable to the parents and guardians of homeless children and youths, and unaccompanied youths;(g) Enrollment disputes are mediated in accordance with section 401(5) of this act;(h) The parent or guardian of a homeless child or youth, and any unaccompanied youth, is fully informed of all transportation services, including transportation to the school of origin, as described in section 301(1)(j)(iii) of this act, and is assisted in accessing transportation to the school that is selected under section 401(1) of this act;(i) School personnel providing services under this chapter receive professional development and other support; and(j) Unaccompanied youths:(i) Are enrolled in school;(ii) Have opportunities to meet the same challenging state academic standards as the state establishes for other children and youth, including through implementation of the procedures under section 301(1)(f)(ii) of this act; and(iii) Are informed of their status as independent students under 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1087vv and that the youths may obtain assistance from the school district liaison to receive verification of such status for purposes of the free application for federal student aid described in 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1090.(2) The coordinator for education of homeless children and youths established under section 601 of this act and school districts shall inform school personnel, service providers, advocates working with homeless families, parents and guardians of homeless children and youths, and homeless children and youths of the duties of the school district liaisons, and publish an annually updated list of the school district liaisons on the website of the office of the superintendent of public instruction.(3) School district liaisons for homeless children and youths shall, as a part of their duties, coordinate and collaborate with the coordinator for education of homeless children and youths established under section 601 of this act and community and school personnel responsible for the provision of education and related services to homeless children and youths. Such coordination must include collecting and providing to the coordinator for education of homeless children and youths the reliable, valid, and comprehensive data needed to meet the requirements of section 601(2) (a) and (c) of this act.(4)(a) Each school district that receives funding provided by specific reference for this chapter in the omnibus appropriations act shall review and revise any policies that may act as barriers to the identification of homeless children and youths or the enrollment of homeless children and youths in schools that are selected in accordance with best interest determinations for the students.(b) In reviewing and revising such policies, consideration must be given to issues concerning transportation, immunization, residency, birth certificates, school records and other documentation, and guardianship.(c) Special attention must be given to ensuring the identification, enrollment, and attendance of homeless children and youths who are not currently attending school.STATE COORDINATORNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 601. (1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall establish or designate an office of the coordinator for education of homeless children and youths.(2) The coordinator for education of homeless children and youths established in accordance with either applicable federal law, this section, or both, shall:(a) Gather and make publicly available reliable, valid, and comprehensive information on:(i) The number of homeless children and youths identified in the state, which must be posted annually on the website of the superintendent of public instruction;(ii) The nature and extent of the problems homeless children and youths have in gaining access to public preschool programs and to public elementary schools and secondary schools;(iii) The difficulties in identifying the special needs and barriers to the participation and achievement of such children and youths;(iv) Any progress made by the office of the superintendent of public instruction and school districts in the state in addressing such problems and difficulties; and(v) The success of the programs under this chapter in identifying homeless children and youths and allowing such children and youths to enroll in, attend, and succeed in, school;(b) Develop and carry out the state plan described in section 301 of this act;(c) Collect data for and transmit to the secretary of the United States department of education, at such time and in such manner as the secretary may reasonably require, a report containing information necessary to assess the educational needs of homeless children and youths within the state, including data necessary for the secretary to fulfill the responsibilities under the McKinney-Vento homeless assistance act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 11434(h), if applicable;(d) In order to improve the provision of comprehensive education and related services to homeless children and youths and their families, coordinate activities and collaborate with:(i) Educators, including teachers, special education personnel, administrators, and child development and preschool program personnel;(ii) Providers of services to homeless children and youths and their families, including public and private child welfare and social services agencies, law enforcement agencies, juvenile and family courts, agencies providing mental health services, domestic violence agencies, child care providers, runaway and homeless youth centers, and providers of services and programs funded under the runaway and homeless youth act, 42 U.S.C. 5701 et seq.;(iii) Providers of emergency, transitional, and permanent housing to homeless children and youths, and their families, including public housing agencies, shelter operators, operators of transitional housing facilities, and providers of transitional living programs for homeless youths;(iv) School district liaisons designated under section 301(1)(j)(ii) of this act for homeless children and youths; and(v) Community organizations and groups representing homeless children and youths and their families;(e) Provide technical assistance to and conduct monitoring of school districts in coordination with school district liaisons designated under section 301(1)(j)(ii) of this act, to ensure that school districts comply with the requirements in sections 401 through 501, 802, and 901 of this act;(f) Provide professional development opportunities for school district personnel and the school district liaison designated under section 301(1)(j)(ii) of this act to assist such personnel and liaison in identifying and meeting the needs of homeless children and youths, and provide training to the liaison on the definitions of terms related to homelessness specified in section 201 of this act and the McKinney-Vento homeless assistance act, 42 U.S.C. Secs. 11302 and 11360, if applicable; and(g) Respond to inquiries from parents and guardians of homeless children and youths, and, in the case of unaccompanied youths, such youths, to ensure that each child or youth who is the subject of such an inquiry receives the full protections and services provided by this chapter.OSPI DUTIES AND AUTHORITYNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 701. (1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall, directly or through grants, contracts, or cooperative agreements, periodically collect and disseminate data and information regarding:(a) The number and primary nighttime residence of homeless children and youths in all areas served by school districts;(b) The education and related services such children and youths receive;(c) The extent to which the needs of homeless children and youths are being met; and(d) Such other data and information as the superintendent of public instruction determines to be necessary and relevant to carry out this chapter.(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall coordinate such collection and dissemination with other agencies and entities that receive assistance and administer programs under the McKinney-Vento homeless assistance act, 42 U.S.C. Secs. 11431 - 11435, this chapter, or both.(3) The requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section do not apply if equivalent requirements in the McKinney-Vento homeless assistance act, 42 U.S.C. Secs. 11431-11435 are assigned to the secretary of the United States department of education.(4) By October 1, 2030, and every four years thereafter, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must prepare and submit to the governor and the legislature, a report on the status of education of homeless children and youths in Washington, which must include information on:(a) The education of homeless children and youths; and(b) The actions of the superintendent of public instruction and the effectiveness of the programs supported under this chapter.GRANTS TO SCHOOL DISTRICTSNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 801. (1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall make grants available to school districts for the purpose of facilitating services related to the identification, enrollment, attendance, and success in school of homeless children and youths.(2) Services provided under subsection (1) of this section:(a) May be provided through programs on school grounds or at other facilities;(b) Must, to the maximum extent practicable, be provided through existing programs and mechanisms that integrate homeless children and youths with nonhomeless children and youths; and(c) Must be designed to expand or improve services provided as part of a school's regular academic program, but not to replace such services provided under such program.(3) If services under subsection (1) of this section are provided on school grounds, the related schools:(a) May use funding provided by specific reference for this chapter in the omnibus appropriations act to provide the same services to other children and youths who are determined by the school district to be at risk of failing in, or dropping out of, school, subject to the requirements of (b) of this subsection (3); and(b) May not provide services in settings within a school that segregate homeless children and youths from other children and youths, except as necessary for short periods of time:(i) For health and safety emergencies; or(ii) To provide temporary, special, and supplementary services to meet the unique needs of homeless children and youths.(4) Services provided under this section may not replace the regular academic program and must be designed to expand upon or improve services provided as part of the school's regular academic program.(5) Grants made under this section must be for terms not to exceed three years.(6) A school district that desires to receive a grant under this section shall submit an application to the office of the superintendent of public instruction at such time, in such manner, and containing or accompanied by such information as the office of the superintendent of public instruction may reasonably require. Such application must include the following:(a) An assessment of the educational and related needs of homeless children and youths in the area served by such school district, which may be undertaken as part of needs assessments for other disadvantaged groups;(b) A description of the services and programs for which assistance is sought to address the needs identified in (a) of this subsection (6);(c) An assurance that the school district's combined fiscal effort per student, or the aggregate expenditures of that school district and the state with respect to the provision of free public education by such school district for the fiscal year preceding the fiscal year for which the determination is made, was not less than 90 percent of such combined fiscal effort or aggregate expenditures for the second fiscal year preceding the fiscal year for which the determination is made;(d) An assurance that the applicant complies with or will use requested funds to comply with sections 401, 402, and 501 of this act;(e) A description of policies and procedures, consistent with section 212 of this act, that the school district will implement to ensure that activities carried out by the school district will not isolate or stigmatize homeless children and youths;(f) An assurance that the school district will collect and promptly provide data requested by the coordinator for education of homeless children and youths pursuant to section 601(2) of this act; and(g) An assurance that the school district will meet the requirements of section 401 of this act.(7)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall, in accordance with the requirements of this chapter and from amounts made available to it by appropriation, make competitive grants to school districts that submit applications under subsection (6) of this section. Such grants must be awarded on the basis of the need of such school districts for assistance under this section and the quality of the applications submitted.(b) In determining need under (a) of this subsection (7), the office of the superintendent of public instruction may consider the number of homeless children and youths enrolled in early childhood education and other preschool programs, elementary schools, and secondary schools, within the area served by the school district, and shall consider the needs of such children and youths and the ability of the school district to meet such needs. The office of the superintendent of public instruction may also consider the following:(i) The extent to which the proposed use of funds will facilitate the identification, enrollment, retention, and educational success of homeless children and youths;(ii) The extent to which the application reflects coordination with other local and state agencies that serve homeless children and youths;(iii) The extent to which the applicant exhibits in the application and in current practice, as of the date of submission of the application, a commitment to education for all homeless children and youths; and(iv) Such other criteria as the office of the superintendent of public instruction determines appropriate.(c) In determining the quality of applications under (a) of this subsection (7), the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall consider the following:(i) The applicant's needs assessment under (a) of this subsection (7) and the likelihood that the program presented in the application will meet such needs;(ii) The types, intensity, and coordination of the services to be provided under the program;(iii) The extent to which the applicant will promote meaningful involvement of parents or guardians of homeless children or youths in the education of their children;(iv) The extent to which homeless children and youths will be integrated into the regular education program;(v) The quality of the applicant's evaluation plan for the program;(vi) The extent to which services provided under this chapter will be coordinated with other services available to homeless children and youths and their families;(vii) The extent to which the school district will use the grant to leverage resources, including by maximizing nonsubgrant funding for the position of the school district liaison described in section 501 of this act and the provision of transportation;(viii) How the school district will use funds to serve homeless children and youths under section 1113(c)(3) of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 6313(c)(3); and(ix) The extent to which the applicant's program meets such other measures as the office of the superintendent considers indicative of a high quality program, such as the extent to which the school district will provide case management or related services to unaccompanied youths.(8) A school district may use funds awarded under this section for activities that carry out the purpose of this chapter, including the following:(a) The provision of tutoring, supplemental instruction, and enriched educational services that are linked to the achievement of the same challenging state academic standards as the state establishes for other children and youths;(b) The provision of expedited evaluations of the strengths and needs of homeless children and youths, including needs and eligibility for programs and services, such as educational programs for highly capable students, children with disabilities, and English learners, services provided under Title I of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq. or similar state or local programs, programs in career and technical education, and school nutrition programs;(c) Professional development and other activities for educators and specialized instructional support personnel that are designed to heighten the understanding and sensitivity of such personnel to the needs of homeless children and youths, the rights of such children and youths, and the specific educational needs of runaway and homeless youths;(d) The provision of referral services to homeless children and youths for medical, dental, mental, and other health services;(e) The provision of assistance to defray the excess cost of transportation for students under section 402(1)(a) of this act, not otherwise provided through federal, state, or local funding, where necessary to enable students to attend the school selected under section 401 of this act;(f) The provision of developmentally appropriate early childhood education programs, not otherwise provided through federal, state, or local funding, for preschool-aged homeless children;(g) The provision of services and assistance to attract, engage, and retain homeless children and youths, particularly homeless children and youths who are not enrolled in school, in public school programs and services provided to nonhomeless children and youths;(h) The provision for homeless children and youths of before-school and after-school, mentoring, and summer programs in which a teacher or other qualified individual provides tutoring, homework assistance, and supervision of educational activities;(i) If necessary, the payment of fees and other costs associated with tracking, obtaining, and transferring records necessary to enroll homeless children and youths in school, including birth certificates, immunization or other required health records, academic records, guardianship records, and evaluations for special programs or services;(j) The provision of education and training to the parents and guardians of homeless children and youths about the rights of, and resources available to, such children and youths, and other activities designed to increase the meaningful involvement of parents and guardians of homeless children or youths in the education of such children or youths;(k) The development of coordination between schools and agencies providing services to homeless children and youths, as described in section 402 (2) through (5) of this act;(l) The provision of specialized instructional support services, including violence prevention counseling, and referrals for such services;(m) Activities to address the particular needs of homeless children and youths that may arise from domestic violence and parental mental health or substance abuse problems;(n) The adaptation of space and purchase of supplies for any nonschool facilities made available under subsection (2) of this section to provide services under this section;(o) The provision of school supplies, including those supplies to be distributed at shelters or temporary housing facilities, or other appropriate locations; and(p) The provision of other extraordinary or emergency assistance needed to enable homeless children and youths to attend school and participate fully in school activities.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 802. (1) A school district applying for grants under section 801 of this act to implement this chapter must demonstrate that the school district is meeting, as of the date of submission of the application, the same federal and state standards, regulations, and mandates as other public schools in the state, such as complying with section 1111 of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 6311 and providing a full range of education and related services, including services applicable to students with disabilities.(2) A school district applying for grants as provided in subsection (1) of this section that fails to meet the standards, regulations, and mandates described in subsection (1) of this section is not eligible to receive funding provided by specific reference for this chapter in the omnibus appropriations act for programs carried out in such school after the first date of such failure.APPLICATION TO CHARTER SCHOOLS AND STATE-TRIBAL COMPACT SCHOOLSNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 901. This chapter governs school operation and management under RCW 28A.710.040 and 28A.715.020 and applies to charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW and state-tribal education compact schools subject to chapter 28A.715 RCW to the same extent as it applies to school districts.NONSEGREGATION OF HOMELESS STUDENTSNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1001. In providing a free public education to a homeless child or youth, no school district receiving funding provided by specific reference for this chapter in the omnibus appropriations act may segregate such child or youth in a separate school, or in a separate program within a school, based on such child's or youth's status as homeless.STATE AND LOCAL COMPLIANCE THROUGH MEETING APPLICABLE FEDERAL REQUIREMENTSNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1101. Actions of the office of the superintendent of public instruction and school districts that meet requirements of the McKinney-Vento homeless assistance act, 42 U.S.C. Secs. 11431 - 11435, as it exists on January 1, 2026, also satisfy equivalent requirements established in sections 101 through 1001 of this act.MISCELLANEOUSNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1201. Sections 101 through 1101 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 28A RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1202. If any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state.--- END ---